src/fst/stems/prepositions.lexc
!! # Tavringer prepositions

LEXICON pr
+Pr: # ;

LEXICON Prepositions
appre pr "upp" ;
asjter pr "av, bakom, efter" ;
famm pr "från" ;
for pr "för" ;
an pr "i" ;
ando pr "i" ;
asjter pr "av, efter, bakom" ;
